New Jersey, session 221, A5252.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Bond Act of 2025." 2.  a.  The Legislature finds and declares that: (1) Despite recent progress in providing New Jerseyans with drinking water that is free of lead, notably the passage of P.L.2021, c.183 (C.58:12A-40 et seq.), and P.L.2021, c.183 (C.40A:4-35.2 et al.), which require public community water systems to inventory and replace their lead drinking water service lines and provide a method by which municipal water systems may finance the costs of the replacement projects, New Jersey residents are still exposed to harmful levels of lead in their drinking water, caused by the use of lead service lines and lead plumbing in homes, schools, and places of work. (2) According to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, 20 percent of lead exposure comes from drinking water, although the percentage is higher for infants who consume mostly mixed formula. (3) Approximately 3,226 children in New Jersey were found to have elevated blood levels at or above 5 micrograms per deciliter according to the 2022 Annual Report on Childhood Lead Exposure in New Jersey, published by the New Jersey Department of Health. (4) Approximately 0.5 out of every 100,000 employed adults in New Jersey had elevated blood levels in 2022, according to the New Jersey Department of Health. (5) In 1986, Congress passed an amendment to the federal "Safe Drinking Water Act" to prohibit the use of pipes, solder, or flux that contain lead in plumbing that provides water to be used for human consumption. (6) Existing plumbing was exempted from this law, meaning that millions of homes in New Jersey, particularly those build prior to 1986, may contain lead pipes or be served by lead service lines. b.  The Legislature therefore determines that it is in the public interest to issue bonds in the name of the State of New Jersey in order to establish a revolving fund to provide grants and loans to support projects to replace lead plumbing and service lines in the State. 3.  As used in this act: "Bonds" mean the bonds authorized to be issued, or issued, under this act. "Commission" means the New Jersey Commission on Capital Budgeting and Planning. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Environmental Protection. "Cost" means the expenses incurred in connection with: a lead plumbing replacement project; the execution of any agreements and franchises deemed by the department to be necessary or useful and convenient in connection with any lead plumbing replacement project authorized by this act; the procurement or provision of engineering, inspection, planning, legal, financial, or other professional services, estimates, studies, reports, or advice, including the services of a bond registrar or an authenticating agent; feasibility studies; the issuance of bonds, or any interest or discount thereon; the administrative, organizational, operating, or other expenses incident to the financing and completing of any project authorized by this act; the establishment of a reserve fund or funds for working capital, operating, maintenance, or replacement expenses and for the payment or security of principal or interest on bonds, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury may determine; and reimbursement to any fund of the State of moneys which may have been transferred or advanced therefrom to any fund created by this act, or of any moneys which may have been expended therefrom for, or in connection with, any project authorized by this act. "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection or any agency or department successor to its power and responsibilities. "Government securities" means any bonds or other obligations which as to principal and interest constitute direct obligations of, or are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America, including obligations of any federal agency, to the extent those obligations are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America, and any certificates or any other evidences of an ownership interest in those obligations of, or unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America or in specified portions which may consist of the principal of, or the interest on, those obligations. "Lead internal plumbing" means any pipe, tube, connection or other fitting through which drinking water or wastewater flows to or from faucets, sinks, or other outlets inside a residence, school, place of business, or other structure or facility, which is made of, or lined with, a material consisting of lead. "Lead plumbing replacement project" means any work relating to the replacement of lead internal plumbing or a lead service line in the State. "Lead service line" means a water supply connection that is made of, or lined with, a material consisting of lead, and which connects a water main to a building inlet.  A lead pigtail, lead gooseneck, or other lead fitting shall be considered to be a lead service line, regardless of the composition of the service line or other portions of piping to which such piece is attached.  A galvanized service line shall be considered to be a lead service line. A lead service line may be owned by the public community water system, a property owner, or both. "School" means a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school offering education in grades K through 12, or any combination thereof, at which a child may legally fulfill compulsory school attendance requirements. "Water system" means a system for providing potable water to any person. 4.  The commissioner shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968 c.410 (C.52:14B‑1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act.  The commissioner shall review and consider the findings and recommendations of the commission in the administration of the provisions of this act. 5.  a.  Bonds of the State of New Jersey are authorized to be issued in the aggregate principal amount of $400 million for the purpose of financing lead plumbing replacement projects in the State.  Of this aggregate principal amount, $200 million shall be used to provide grants to homeowners and schools to finance lead plumbing replacement projects and $200 million shall be used to provide loans through a revolving loan fund to the owner or operator of a water system, school, or business entity, to finance lead plumbing replacement projects. b. Procedures for the review and approval of, and eligibility criteria for grants and loans issued pursuant to this act shall be established by the commissioner. 6.  The bonds authorized under this act shall be serial bonds, term bonds, or a combination thereof, and shall be known as "2025 Lead-Free Drinking Water Bonds."  They shall be issued from time to time as the issuing officials herein named shall determine and may be issued in coupon form, fully‑registered form or book‑entry form.  The bonds may be subject to redemption prior to maturity and shall mature and be paid not later than 35 years from the respective dates of their issuance. 7.  The Governor, the State Treasurer, and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury, or any two of these officials, herein referred to as "the issuing officials," are authorized to carry out the provisions of this act relating to the issuance of bonds, and shall determine all matters in connection therewith, subject to the provisions of this act.  If an issuing official is absent from the State or incapable of acting for any reason, the powers and duties of that issuing official shall be exercised and performed by the person authorized by law to act in an official capacity in the place of that issuing official. 8.  Bonds issued in accordance with the provisions of this act shall be a direct obligation of the State of New Jersey, and the faith and credit of the State are pledged for the payment of the interest and redemption premium thereon, if any, when due, and for the payment of the principal thereof at maturity or earlier redemption date.  The principal of and interest on the bonds shall be exempt from taxation by the State or by any county, municipality or other taxing district of the State. 9.  The bonds shall be signed in the name of the State by means of the manual or facsimile signature of the Governor under the Great Seal of the State, which seal may be by facsimile or by way of any other form of reproduction on the bonds, and attested by the manual or facsimile signature of the Secretary of State, or an Assistant Secretary of State, and shall be countersigned by the facsimile signature of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury and may be manually authenticated by an authenticating agent or bond registrar, as the issuing official shall determine.  Interest coupons, if any, attached to the bonds shall be signed by the facsimile signature of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury.  The bonds may be issued notwithstanding that an official signing them or whose manual or facsimile signature appears on the bonds or coupons has ceased to hold office at the time of issuance, or at the time of the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser thereof. 10.  a.  The bonds shall recite that they are issued for the purposes set forth in section 5 of this act, that they are issued pursuant to this act, that this act was submitted to the people of the State at the general election next occurring at least 70 days after enactment as specified in section 23 of this act, and that this act was approved by a majority of the legally qualified voters of the State voting thereon at the election.  This recital shall be conclusive evidence of the authority of the State to issue the bonds and their validity.  Any bonds containing this recital shall, in any suit, action, or proceeding involving their validity, be conclusively deemed to be fully authorized by this act and to have been issued, sold, executed, and delivered in conformity herewith and with all other provisions of laws applicable hereto, and shall be incontestable for any cause. b.  The bonds shall be issued in those denominations and in the form or forms, whether coupon, fully-registered, or book-entry, and with or without provisions for interchangeability thereof, as may be determined by the issuing officials. 11.  When the bonds are issued from time to time, the bonds of each issue shall constitute a separate series to be designated by the issuing officials.  Each series of bonds shall bear such rate or rates of interest as may be determined by the issuing officials, which interest shall be payable semiannually; except that the first and last interest periods may be longer or shorter, in order that intervening semiannual payments may be at convenient dates. 12.  The bonds shall be issued and sold at the price or prices and under the terms, conditions, and regulations as the issuing officials may prescribe, after notice of the sale, published at least once in at least three newspapers published in this State, and at least once in a publication carrying municipal bond notices and devoted primarily to financial news, published in this State or in the city of New York, the first notice to appear at least five days prior to the day of bidding.  The notice of sale may contain a provision to the effect that any bid in pursuance thereof may be rejected.  In the event of rejection or failure to receive any acceptable bid, the issuing officials, at any time within 60 days from the date of the advertised sale, may sell the bonds at a private sale at such price or prices under the terms and conditions as the issuing officials may prescribe.  The issuing officials may sell all or part of the bonds of any series as issued to any State fund or to the federal government or any agency thereof, at a private sale, without advertisement. 13.  Until permanent bonds are prepared, the issuing officials may issue temporary bonds in the form and with those privileges as to their registration and exchange for permanent bonds as may be determined by the issuing officials. 14.  a.  The proceeds from the sale of bonds used to provide grants to homeowners and schools to finance lead plumbing replacement projects, as set forth in section 5 shall be paid to the State Treasurer, shall be held by the State Treasurer in a separate fund, and shall be deposited in such depositories as may be selected by the State Treasurer to the credit of the fund, which fund shall be known as the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Grant Fund." b.  The proceeds from the sale of bonds used to provide loans to the owners and operators of water systems, schools, and business entities to finance lead plumbing replacement projects, as set forth in section 5 shall be paid to the State Treasurer, shall be held by the State Treasurer in a separate fund, and shall be deposited in such depositories as may be selected by the State Treasurer to the credit of the fund, which fund shall be known as the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Revolving Loan Fund." 15.  a.  (1) The moneys in the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Grant Fund" are specifically dedicated and shall be applied to the cost of grants to homeowners and schools, to finance lead plumbing replacement projects, as set forth in section 5 of this act.  However, no moneys in the fund shall be expended for those purposes, except as otherwise authorized by this act, without the specific appropriation thereof by the Legislature, but bonds may be issued as herein provided, notwithstanding that the Legislature shall not have then adopted an act making a specific appropriation of any of the moneys. (2) The moneys in the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Revolving Loan Fund" are specifically dedicated and shall be applied to the cost of loans to owners and operators of water systems, schools, and business entities, to finance lead plumbing replacement projects, as set forth in section 5 of this act.  However, no moneys in the fund shall be expended for those purposes, except as otherwise authorized by this act, without the specific appropriation thereof by the Legislature, but bonds may be issued as herein provided, notwithstanding that the Legislature shall not have then adopted an act making a specific appropriation of any of the moneys.  Payments of principal and interest on loans made from the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Revolving Loan Fund" shall be returned to that fund for use for any authorized purpose to which moneys in the fund may be used pursuant to this act. b.  At any time prior to the issuance and sale of bonds under this act, the State Treasurer is authorized to transfer from any available moneys in any fund of the treasury of the State to the credit of the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Grant Fund" or the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Revolving Loan Fund" those sums as the State Treasurer may deem necessary.  The sums so transferred shall be returned to the same fund of the treasury of the State by the State Treasurer from the proceeds of the sale of the first issue of bonds. c.  Pending their application to the purposes provided in this act, the moneys in the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Grant Fund" or the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Revolving Loan Fund" may be invested and reinvested as are other trust funds in the custody of the State Treasurer, in the manner provided by law.  Net earnings received from the investment, reinvestment, or deposit of moneys in the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Grant Fund" or the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Revolving Loan Fund," shall be returned to the fund for use for any authorized purpose to which moneys in the fund may be used pursuant to this act. 16.  If any coupon bond, coupon, or registered bond is lost, mutilated, or destroyed, a new bond or coupon shall be executed and delivered of like tenor, in substitution for the lost, mutilated, or destroyed bond or coupon, upon the owner furnishing to the issuing officials evidence satisfactory to them of the loss, mutilation, or destruction of the bond or coupon, the ownership thereof, and security, indemnity, and reimbursement for expenses connected therewith, as the issuing officials may require. 17.  The accrued interest, if any, received upon the sale of the bonds shall be applied to the discharge of a like amount of interest upon the bonds when due.  Any expense incurred by the issuing officials for advertising, engraving, printing, clerical, authenticating, registering, legal, or other services necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon them by the provisions of this act shall be paid from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds by the State Treasurer, upon the warrant of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury, in the same manner as other obligations of the State are paid. 18.  Bonds of each series issued hereunder shall mature, including any sinking fund redemptions, not later than the 35th year from the date of issue of that series, and in amounts as shall be determined by the issuing officials.  The issuing officials may reserve to the State by appropriate provision in the bonds of any series the power to redeem any of the bonds prior to maturity at the price or prices and upon the terms and conditions as may be provided in the bonds. 19.  Any bond or bonds issued hereunder which are subject to refinancing pursuant to the "Refunding Bond Act of 1985," P.L.1985, c.74 as amended by P.L.1992, c.182 (C.49:2B-1 et seq.), shall no longer be deemed to be outstanding, shall no longer constitute a direct obligation of the State of New Jersey, and the faith and credit of the State shall no longer be pledged to the payment of the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on the bonds, and the bonds shall be secured solely by and payable solely from moneys and government securities deposited in trust with one or more trustees or escrow agents, which trustees and escrow agents shall be trust companies or national or state banks having powers of a trust company, located either within or without the State, as provided herein, whenever there shall be deposited in trust with the trustees or escrow agents, as provided herein, either moneys or government securities, including government securities issued or held in book-entry form on the books of the Department of Treasury of the United States, the principal of and interest on which when due will provide money which, together with the moneys, if any, deposited with the trustees or escrow agents at the same time, shall be sufficient to pay when due the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest due and to become due on the bonds on or prior to the redemption date or maturity date thereof, as the case may be; provided the government securities shall not be subject to redemption prior to their maturity other than at the option of the holder thereof.  The State of New Jersey hereby covenants with the holders of any bonds for which government securities or moneys shall have been deposited in trust with the trustees or escrow agents as provided in this section that, except as otherwise provided in this section, neither the government securities nor moneys so deposited with the trustees or escrow agents shall be withdrawn or used by the State for any purpose other than, and shall be held in trust for, the payment of the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest to become due on the bonds; provided that any cash received from the principal or interest payments on the government securities deposited with the trustees or escrow agents, to the extent the cash will not be required at any time for that purpose, shall be paid over to the State, as received by the trustees or escrow agents, free and clear of any trust, lien, pledge, or assignment securing the bonds; and to the extent the cash will be required for that purpose at a later date, shall, to the extent practicable and legally permissible, be reinvested in government securities maturing at times and in amounts sufficient to pay when due the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest to become due on the bonds on and prior to the redemption date or maturity date thereof, as the case may be, and interest earned from the reinvestments shall be paid over to the State, as received by the trustees or escrow agents, free and clear of any trust, lien, or pledge securing the bonds.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein:  a.  the trustees or escrow agents shall, if so directed by the issuing officials, apply moneys on deposit with the trustees or escrow agents pursuant to the provisions of this section, and redeem or sell government securities so deposited with the trustees or escrow agents, and apply the proceeds thereof to (1) the purchase of the bonds which were refinanced by the deposit with the trustees or escrow agents of the moneys and government securities and immediately thereafter cancel all bonds so purchased, or (2) the purchase of different government securities; provided however, that the moneys and government securities on deposit with the trustees or escrow agents after the purchase and cancellation of the bonds or the purchase of different government securities shall be sufficient to pay when due the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on all other bonds in respect of which the moneys and government securities were deposited with the trustees or escrow agents on or prior to the redemption date or maturity date thereof, as the case may be; and b. in the event that on any date, as a result of any purchases and cancellations of bonds or any purchases of different government securities, as provided in this sentence, the total amount of moneys and government securities remaining on deposit with the trustees or escrow agents is in excess of the total amount which would have been required to be deposited with the trustees or escrow agents on that date in respect of the remaining bonds for which the deposit was made in order to pay when due the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on the remaining bonds, the trustees or escrow agents shall, if so directed by the issuing officials, pay the amount of the excess to the State, free and clear of any trust, lien, pledge, or assignment securing the refunding bonds. 20.  Refunding bonds issued pursuant to P.L.1985, c.74 as amended by P.L.1992, c.182 (C.49:2B-1 et seq.) may be consolidated with bonds issued pursuant to section 5 of this act or with bonds issued pursuant to any other act for purposes of sale. 21.  To provide funds to meet the interest and principal payment requirements for the bonds and refunding bonds issued under this act and outstanding, there is appropriated in the order following: a.  Revenue derived from the collection of taxes under the "Sales and Use Tax Act," P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), or so much thereof as may be required; and b.  If, at any time, funds necessary to meet the interest, redemption premium, if any, and principal payments on outstanding bonds issued under this act are insufficient or not available, there shall be assessed, levied, and collected annually in each of the municipalities of the counties of this State, a tax on the real and personal property upon which municipal taxes are or shall be assessed, levied, and collected, sufficient to meet the interest on all outstanding bonds issued hereunder and on the bonds proposed to be issued under this act in the calendar year in which the tax is to be raised and for the payment of bonds falling due in the year following the year for which the tax is levied.  The tax shall be assessed, levied, and collected in the same manner and at the same time as are other taxes upon real and personal property.  The governing body of each municipality shall cause to be paid to the county treasurer of the county in which the municipality is located, on or before December 15 in each year, the amount of tax herein directed to be assessed and levied, and the county treasurer shall pay the amount of the tax to the State Treasurer on or before December 20 in each year. If on or before December 31 in any year, the issuing officials, by resolution, determine that there are moneys in the General Fund beyond the needs of the State, sufficient to pay the principal of bonds falling due and all interest and redemption premium, if any, payable in the ensuing calendar year, the issuing officials shall file the resolution in the office of the State Treasurer, whereupon the State Treasurer shall transfer the moneys to a separate fund to be designated by the State Treasurer, and shall pay the principal, redemption premium, if any, and interest out of that fund as the same shall become due and payable, and the other sources of payment of the principal, redemption premium, if any, and interest provided for in this section shall not then be available, and the receipts for the year from the tax specified in subsection a. of this section shall be considered and treated as part of the General Fund, available for general purposes. 22.  Should the State Treasurer, by December 31 of any year, deem it necessary, because of the insufficiency of funds collected from the sources of revenues as provided in this act, to meet the interest and principal payments for the year after the ensuing year, then the State Treasurer shall certify to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury the amount necessary to be raised by taxation for those purposes, the same to be assessed, levied and collected for and in the ensuing calendar year.  The director shall, on or before March 1 following, calculate the amount in dollars to be assessed, levied and collected in each county as herein set forth.  This calculation shall be based upon the corrected assessed valuation of each county for the year preceding the year in which the tax is to be assessed, but the tax shall be assessed, levied and collected upon the assessed valuation of the year in which the tax is  assessed and levied.  The director shall certify the amount to the county board of taxation and the treasurer of each county.  The county board of taxation shall include the proper amount in the current tax levy of the several taxing districts of the county in proportion to the ratables as ascertained for the current year. 23.  For the purpose of complying with the provisions of the State Constitution, this act shall be submitted to the people at the general election next occurring at least 70 days after enactment.  To inform the people of the contents of this act, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of State, after this section takes effect, and at least 60 days prior to the election, to cause this act to be published at least once in one or more newspapers of each county, if any newspapers be published therein and to notify the clerk of each county of this State of the passage of this act; and the clerks respectively, in accordance with the instructions of the Secretary of State, shall have printed on each of the ballots the following: If you approve of the act entitled below, make a cross (x), plus (+), or check ( a ) mark in the square opposite the word "Yes." If you disapprove of the act entitled below, make a cross (x), plus (+), or check ( a ) mark in the square opposite the word "No." If voting machines are used, a vote of "Yes" or "No" shall be equivalent to these markings respectively. LEAD-FREE DRINKING WATER BOND ACT OF 2025 YES Do you approve the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025"? This act authorizes the State to issue bonds in the amount of $400 million.  The monies will be used for projects to replace lead plumbing and lead service lines in the State. INTERPRETIVE STATEMENT NO Approval of this act will allow the State to sell $400 million in bonds.  $200 million would be used to issue grants to homeowners and schools to fund projects to replace lead plumbing in residences and schools.  $200 million would be used to establish a loan fund.  The loan fund would provide loans to water systems, schools, and businesses to fund projects to replace lead service lines and lead plumbing in those facilities.  Money from loan repayments would go back into the fund. The fact and date of the approval or passage of this act, as the case may be, may be inserted in the appropriate place after the title in the ballot.  No other requirements of law of any kind or character as to notice or procedure, except as herein provided, need be adhered to. The votes so cast for and against the approval of this act, by ballot or voting machine, shall be counted and the result thereof returned by the election officer, and a canvass of the election had in the same manner as is provided for by law in the case of the election of a Governor, and the approval or disapproval of this act so determined shall be declared in the same manner as the result of an election for a Governor, and if there is a majority of all the votes cast for and against it at the election in favor of the approval of this act, then all the provisions of this act not made effective theretofore shall take effect forthwith. 24.  There is appropriated the sum of $5,000 to the Department of State for expenses in connection with the publication of notice pursuant to section 23 of this act. 25.  The commissioner shall submit to the State Treasurer and the commission with the department's annual budget request a plan for the expenditure of funds from the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Grant Fund" and the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Revolving Loan Fund" for the upcoming fiscal year.  This plan shall include the following information:  a performance evaluation of the expenditures made from the funds to date; a description of programs planned during the upcoming fiscal year; a copy of the regulations in force governing the operation of programs that are financed, in part or in whole, by funds from the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Grant Fund" and the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Revolving Loan Fund"; and an estimate of expenditures for the upcoming fiscal year. 26. Immediately following the submission to the Legislature of the Governor's annual budget message, the commissioner shall submit to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), and to the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor, copies of the plan called for under section 25 of this act, together with such changes therein as may have been required by the Governor's budget message. 27.  All appropriations from the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Grant Fund" and the "Lead-Free Drinking Water Act of 2025 Revolving Loan Fund" shall be by specific allocation for each project, on a municipal area-by-area basis, and any transfer of any funds so appropriated shall require the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor. 28.  This section and sections 23 and 24 of this act shall take effect immediately and the remainder of this act shall take effect as and when provided in section 23 of this act.